Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1416
Acting without license; penalty.

Any person acting as a motor vehicle dealer, trailer dealer, wrecker or salvage dealer, motorcycle dealer, auction dealer, dealer's agent, manufacturer, factory representative, distributor, or distributor representative without having first obtained the license provided in section 60-1406 is guilty of a Class IV felony and is subject to the civil penalty provisions of section 60-1411.02.

Laws 1957, c. 280, § 16, p. 1023;

Laws 1963, c. 365, § 12, p. 1178;

Laws 1971, LB 768, § 19;

Laws 1974, LB 754, § 13;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 95;

Laws 1984, LB 825, § 26;

Laws 1989, LB 47, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 564, § 8;

Laws 2003, LB 498, § 10;

Laws 2017, LB346, § 11.

Mens rea is not required to convict a person for acting without a license under this section because the offense is a public welfare offense. State v. Merchant, 285 Neb. 456, 827 N.W.2d 473 (2013).